Utah, session 2026, HB150.
Section 1. Section 53F-2-504 is amended to read:53F-2-504Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 07/01/26. Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Eligible teacher" means a teacher or licensed education professional, including a speech-language pathologist or speech-language technician, who:(i)has a qualifying assignment;(ii)qualifies for the teacher'sindividual's assignment in accordance with an LEA's policy described in Subsection (2); and(iii)(A)is a new employee; or(B)has not received an unsatisfactory rating on the teacher'sindividual's three most recent evaluations.(b)"High-needs area" means at least two and up to five teaching assignments that an LEA designates in a policy as challenging to fill or retain.(c)"Program" means the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators program.(d)"Qualifying assignment" means a teacher who is assigned to a high-needs areaan assignment to a high-needs area.(2)(a)An LEA shall create a policy describing the administration of the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators program within the LEA, including:(i)identifying the LEA's high-needs areas;(ii)the amount of the salary supplement;(iii)establishing an appeals process for a teacheran individual to follow if the teacherindividual does not receive a salary supplement, including:(A)allowing a teacheran individual to appeal eligibility as an eligible teacher with a qualifying assignment on the basis that the teacherindividual has a teaching assignmentan assignment that is substantially equivalent to a high-needs area; and(B)requiring a teacheran individual to provide transcripts and other documentation to the LEA governing board in order for the LEA governing board to determine if the teacherindividual is an eligible teacher with a qualifying teaching background;(iv)a process for determining if a teacheran individual is an eligible teacher, including a verification process; and(v)a process for certifying a list of eligible teachers to be awardedwhom the LEA awards a salary supplement under this section.(b)An LEA shall update the policy described in Subsection (2)(a) annually and provide notice of any changes to teacherspotential eligible teachers within the LEA.(3)Subject to legislative appropriations and an LEA having the policy described in Subsection (2), the state board shall allocate funding appropriated for the Salary SupplementsSupplement for Highly Needed Educators program in accordance with this section by:(a)for charter schools:(i)distributing an amount that is equal to the product of:(A)charter school enrollment on October 1 in the prior year, or, for a new charter school, projected enrollment for a charter school in the charter school's first year of operations, divided by enrollment on October 1 in public schools statewide in the prior year; and(B)the total amount available for distribution; and(ii)allocating to each charter school:(A)an equally divided portion of 20% of the amount described in Subsection (3)(a)(i); and(B)80% of the amount described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) on a per-student basis; and(b)for school districts and the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind:,(i)distributing the remainder of funds available for distribution after the distribution to charter schools under Subsection (3)(a)(i) by allocating to each school district:(A)(i)an equally divided portion of 20% of the amount described in Subsection (3)(b)(i); and(B)(ii)80% of the amount described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) on a per-student basis.(c)(4)An LEA shall use funds described in Subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) to pay the LEA's proportional part of an eligible teacher's salary supplement if:(i)(a)the eligible teacher is an employee of a regional education service agency, as defined in Section 53G-4-410; and(ii)(b)the LEA is a member of the regional education service agency that employs the eligible teacher.(4)(5)(a)An LEA shall include employer-paid benefits in the amount of each salary supplement.(b)Employer-paid benefits are an addition to the salary supplement amount established by an LEAan LEA establishes under Subsection (2).(5)(6)The salary supplement is part of an eligible teacher's base pay, subject to eligible teacher's qualification as an eligible teacher every year, semester, or quarter.(6)(7)The state board shall annually report to the Education Interim Committee:(a)which teaching assignments LEAs have designated as high-needs; and(b)the number of eligible teachers.(7)(8)An LEA may increase the amount of funds the LEA provides to the LEA's eligible teachers under the program if the LEA:(a)first ensures proper distribution of funds the LEA receives under the program to the the LEA's eligible teachers; and(b)experiences a carry forward or leftover balance.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-2-527 is amended to read:53F-2-527Effective 07/01/26. Appropriations for teaching supplies and materials.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Classroom teacher" means a teacher whoor licensed education professional, including a speech-language pathologist or speech-language technician, that:(i)is assigned by an LEA in an LEA assigns to a permanent teacherinstructional or related service position filled by one teacher, speech-language pathologist, speech-language technician, or two or more job-sharing teachers employed by an LEAan LEA employs;(ii)is licensed and paid on an LEA's salary schedule;(iii)is employed for an entire contract period; and(iv)is primarily responsible to provide instruction, therapy, or a combination of instructional, therapeutic, and counseling services to students in public schoolsa student in a public school.(b)"Teaching supplies and materials" means consumable and non-consumable items that are used for educational or therapeutic purposes by teachersa classroom teacher in a classroom activitiesactivity that are approved by the LEAan LEA approves.(2)For the fiscal year that begins on or after July 1, 2024, and except Except as provided in Subsection (3), the state board shall distribute money appropriated for teaching supplies and materials as follows:(a)$500 to each classroom teacher position for pre-kindergarten special education and kindergarten through grade 6; and(b)$250 to each classroom teacher position for grades 7 through 12.(3)If funding is insufficient to provide the per-teacher amounts described in Subsection (2), the state board may proportionally adjust the per-teacher amount based on the amount of available funding.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.